deutsch.lexc
LEXICON Varbeiten

@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@e	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@est	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@et	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@et	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+1P:@D.GE@ete    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+2P:@D.GE@etest   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+3P:@D.GE@ete    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+1P:@D.GE@eten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+2P:@D.GE@etet    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+3P:@D.GE@eten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+1P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+2P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+3P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+2P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+1P:et        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+2P:et       #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+3P:et        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+1P:et       #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+2P:et        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+3P:et       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+1P:et        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+2P:et       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+3P:et        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+1P:et       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+2P:et        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+3P:et       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+1P:et        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+2P:et       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+3P:et        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+1P:et       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+2P:et        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+3P:et       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@e        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@est       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@e        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@et        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+1P:@D.GE@ete    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+2P:@D.GE@etest   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+3P:@D.GE@ete    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+1P:@D.GE@eten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+2P:@D.GE@etet    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+3P:@D.GE@eten   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+1P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+2P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+3P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+2P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+1P:et        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+2P:et       #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+3P:et        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+1P:et       #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+2P:et        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+3P:et       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+1P:et        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+2P:et       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+3P:et        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+1P:et       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+2P:et        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+3P:et       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+1P:et        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+2P:et       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+3P:et        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+1P:et       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+2P:et        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+3P:et       #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@e   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@et    #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Inf:@D.GE@en	#;
@D.GE@+V+Part1:@D.GE@end  #;
+V+Part2:et	#;

LEXICON Vfahren

@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@e	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@^1st	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@^1t	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@t	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en	#;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+1P:@D.GE@1    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+2P:@D.GE@1st   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Sg+3P:@D.GE@1    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+1P:@D.GE@1en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+2P:@D.GE@1t    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Imperf+Pl+3P:@D.GE@1en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+1P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+2P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Sg+3P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+2P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Ind+Fut+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+1P:en        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+2P:en       #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Sg+3P:en        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+1P:en       #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+2P:en        #;
+V+Ind+Perf+Pl+3P:en       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+1P:en        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+2P:en       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Sg+3P:en        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+1P:en       #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+2P:en        #;
+V+Ind+Pluperf+Pl+3P:en       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+1P:en        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+2P:en       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Sg+3P:en        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+1P:en       #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+2P:en        #;
+V+Ind+Futperf+Pl+3P:en       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@e        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@est       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@e        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@et        #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en       #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+1P:@D.GE@^1e    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+2P:@D.GE@^1est   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Sg+3P:@D.GE@^1e    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+1P:@D.GE@^1en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+2P:@D.GE@^1et    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Imperf+Pl+3P:@D.GE@^1en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+1P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+2P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Sg+3P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+2P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Subj+Fut+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+1P:en        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+2P:en       #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Sg+3P:en        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+1P:en       #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+2P:en        #;
+V+Subj+Perf+Pl+3P:en       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+1P:en        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+2P:en       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Sg+3P:en        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+1P:en       #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+2P:en        #;
+V+Subj+Pluperf+Pl+3P:en       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+1P:en        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+2P:en       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Sg+3P:en        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+1P:en       #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+2P:en        #;
+V+Subj+Futperf+Pl+3P:en       #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+1P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Sg+3P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@en    #;
@D.GE@+V+Cond+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Sg+2P:@D.GE@e   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+1P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+2P:@D.GE@t    #;
@D.GE@+V+Impe+Pres+Pl+3P:@D.GE@en   #;
@D.GE@+V+Inf:@D.GE@en	#;
@D.GE@+V+Part1:@D.GE@end  #;
+V+Part2:en	#;

LEXICON Aneu

+Adj+M+Nom:er	#;
+Adj+M+Acc:en	#;
+Adj+M+Dat:em	#;
+Adj+M+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+F+Nom:e	#;
+Adj+F+Acc:e	#;
+Adj+F+Dat:er	#;
+Adj+F+Gen:er	#;
+Adj+Nt+Nom:es	#;
+Adj+Nt+Acc:es	#;
+Adj+Nt+Dat:em	#;
+Adj+Nt+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Nom:e	#;
+Adj+Pl+Acc:e	#;
+Adj+Pl+Dat:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Gen:er	#;
+Adj+M+Nom:e	#;
+Adj+M+Acc:en	#;
+Adj+M+Dat:en	#;
+Adj+M+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+F+Nom:e	#;
+Adj+F+Acc:e	#;
+Adj+F+Dat:en	#;
+Adj+F+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+Nt+Nom:e	#;
+Adj+Nt+Acc:e	#;
+Adj+Nt+Dat:en	#;
+Adj+Nt+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Nom:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Acc:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Dat:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+M+Nom:er	#;
+Adj+M+Acc:en	#;
+Adj+M+Dat:en	#;
+Adj+M+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+F+Nom:e	#;
+Adj+F+Acc:e	#;
+Adj+F+Dat:en	#;
+Adj+F+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+Nt+Nom:es	#;
+Adj+Nt+Acc:es	#;
+Adj+Nt+Dat:en	#;
+Adj+Nt+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Nom:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Acc:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Dat:en	#;
+Adj+Pl+Gen:en	#;
+Adj+Pos:0	#;
+Adj+Comp:er	#;
+Adj+Super:sten #;
